Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
152

NOXIOUS
WEED CONTROL

Section

152-1 Definitions

152-2 Rules

152-3 Prohibited acts

152-4 Designation of noxious weed

152-5 Designation of areas declared free or
reasonably free

of noxious weeds

152-6 Duties of the department; noxious weed
control and

eradication

152-7 Repealed

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next